Maine, session 132, LD1478.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §12551-A, sub-§6, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 431, §§18
and 19 and affected by §23, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (3) and enacting
the following in its place:
(3) Attempt to take from the inland waters live baitfish for resale using drop nets
through the ice unless the license holder marks all holes made in the ice by that
license holder for that purpose. The holes must be marked either by evergreen
boughs placed around the hole or by suspending at least one strand of fluorescent
biodegradable tape at least 3 feet above the ice around the entire perimeter of the
hole so that the tape is visible from all sides;
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §12551-A, sub-§6, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 431, §§18
and 19 and affected by §23, is further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Take eels; or
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §12551-A, sub-§6, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 431, §§18
and 19 and affected by §23, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (5).
Page 1 - 132LR1361(03)